Hawaii, session 2026, SB3287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that encampments, including tents, makeshift shelters, and other temporary structures used for habitation can pose public safety or traffic hazards when located near roadways. Sweeps and clearances of encampments are done frequently, though without a mandated buffer zone along highly trafficked roadways, substantial resources are being allocated to these efforts yet do not lead to lasting results. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to prohibit the erection, placement, construction, or maintenance of an encampment within one hundred feet of a state highway right-of-way. SECTION 2. The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter sTATE HIGHWAY encampment buffer zone §   -1  Definitions.  As used in this chapter: "Buffer zone" means one hundred feet from a state highway right-of-way under the jurisdiction of the state department of transportation. "Encampment" means a tent, makeshift shelter, or any other temporary structure used for habitation. §   -2  Buffer zone; state highways. (a)  No person shall erect, place, construct, or maintain an encampment within a buffer zone of state highway. (b)  Any person who violates subsection (a) shall be subject to immediate removal and may be subject to a fine not to exceed $200. (c)  Nothing in this section shall preclude a person from being charged with a trespassing violation pursuant to chapter 708 or any other violation. (d)  Law enforcement personnel enforcing this section shall provide information related to temporary housing and homelessness assistance programs to individuals displaced from encampments. (e)  Law enforcement personnel shall take the personal belongings of individuals displaced from encampments into custody and store them at the police station or other designated location, to be returned to the individual upon release from custody." SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________